Utah statutes.
78B-15-602.   Standing to maintain proceeding.

Subject to Part 3, Voluntary Declaration of Paternity, and Sections 78B-15-607 and 78B-15-609, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be maintained by:

(1)  the child;

(2)  the mother of the child;

(3)  a man whose paternity of the child is to be adjudicated;

(4)  the support-enforcement agency or other governmental agency authorized by other law;

(5)  an authorized adoption agency or licensed child-placing agency;

(6)  a representative authorized by law to act for an individual who would otherwise be entitled to maintain a proceeding but who is deceased, incapacitated, or a minor; or

(7)  an intended parent under Part 8, Gestational Agreement.

